South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3871.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "Palmetto Access to HigherEd (PATH) Act." SECTION 2.  Chapter 149, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-149-17. (A)  Palmetto Access to HigherEd (PATH) scholarship program is established and provided by the State to help students: (1) as they transition from a two-year institution to a four-year institution in this State; and (2) who are seeking to gain first-time eligibility for a LIFE Scholarship or regain eligibility for a LIFE Scholarship after having previously achieved and subsequently lost such eligibility. (B) The scholarship is provided to cover the cost of attendance up to a maximum of two thousand eight hundred dollars. The scholarship is available for no more than the one academic year (or two semesters if the transition is mid-year) during which the student transitions from a two-year institution to a four-year institution and is attempting to gain eligibility for a LIFE Scholarship. (C) Eligibility for a PATH scholarship requires that a student: (1) has earned an associate degree or at least thirty credit hours from a public two-year institution in this State; (2) successfully enrolls in a public four-year institution in this State for at least twelve hours of academic credit as a full-time student and earns at least thirty hours of academic credit by the end of the transition academic year or second consecutive semester if transition is mid-year; and (3) must have achieved a grade point average of between 2.75 and 2.99 LIFE GPA at the two-year institution prior to transitioning to the four-year institution. (D) For purposes of this chapter, "transition academic year" means the one academic year of full-time enrollment in a four-year institution immediately following transfer or transition from a two-year institution, during which time a student is seeking to gain or regain LIFE Scholarship eligibility. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----